Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Official Language.

Revisor’s notes. —

AS

44.12.300

—

44.12.390

were enacted by 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6 and codified by the revisor of statutes in 1999, at which time internal references were conformed to reflect the codification.

Editor’s notes. —

For constitutionality of AS

44.12.300

—

44.12.390

, see Alaskans for a Common Language, Inc. v. Kritz, 170 P.3d 183 (Alaska 2007).

Sec. 44.12.300.
Findings and purpose.

The people of the State of Alaska find that English is the common unifying language of the State of Alaska and the United States of America, and declare a compelling interest in promoting, preserving and strengthening its use.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.310.
Official languages.

The English, Inupiaq, Siberian Yupik, Central Alaskan Yup’ik, Alutiiq, Unanga/Cx, Dena’ina, Deg Xinag, Holikachuk, Koyukon, Upper Kuskokwim, Gwich’in, Tanana, Upper Tanana, Tanacross, Hdn, Ahtna, Eyak, Tlingit, Haida, and Tsimshian languages are the official languages of the State of Alaska.

The designation of languages other than English as official languages of the state under (a) of this section does not require or place a duty or responsibility on the state or a municipal government to print a document or record or conduct a meeting, assembly, or other government activity in any language other than English.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6; am §§ 1, 2 ch. 116 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, rewrote this section, which read: “Official language. The English language is the official language of the State of Alaska.”

Sec. 44.12.320.
Scope.

The English language is the language to be used by all public agencies in all government functions and actions.
The English language shall be used in the preparation of all official public documents and records, including all documents officially compiled, published or recorded by the government.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.330.
Applicability.

AS

44.12.300

—

44.12.390

apply to the legislative and executive branches of the State of Alaska and all political subdivisions, including all departments, agencies, divisions and instrumentalities of the State, the University of Alaska, all public authorities and corporations, all local governments and departments, agencies, divisions, and instrumentalities of local governments, and all government officers and employees.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.340.
Exceptions.

The government, as defined in AS

44.12.330

, may use a language other than English when necessary for the following purposes:

to communicate health and safety information or when an emergency requires the use of a language other than English;

to teach another language to students proficient in English;

to teach English to students of limited English proficiency;

to promote international relations, trade, commerce, tourism, or sporting events;

to protect the constitutional and legal rights of criminal defendants;

to serve the needs of the judicial system in civil and criminal cases in compliance with court rules and orders;

to investigate criminal activity and protect the rights of crime victims;

to the extent necessary to comply with federal law, including the Native American Languages Act;

to attend or observe religious ceremonies;

to use non-English terms of art, names, phrases, or expressions included as part of communications otherwise in English; and

to communicate orally with constituents by elected public officials and their staffs, if the public official or staff member is already proficient in a language other than English.

An individual may provide testimony or make a statement to the government in a language other than English, if the individual is not an officer or employee of the government, and if the testimony or statement is translated into English and included in the records of the government.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.350.
Public accountability.

All costs related to the preparation, translation, printing, or recording of documents, records, brochures, pamphlets, flyers, or other material in languages other than English shall be defined as a separate line item in the budget of every governmental agency, department, or office.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.360.
Non-denial of employment or services.

No governmental entity shall require knowledge of a language other than English as a condition of employment unless the requirements of the position fall within one of the exceptions provided in AS

44.12.340

, and facility in another language is a bona fide job qualification required to fulfill a function included within one of the exceptions.

No person may be denied services, assistance, benefits, or facilities, directly or indirectly provided by the government, because that person communicates only in English.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.370.
Private sector excluded.

AS

44.12.300

—

44.12.390

shall not be construed in any way that infringes upon the rights of persons to use languages other than English in activities or functions conducted solely in the private sector, and the government may not restrict the use of language other than English in such private activities or functions.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.380.
Private cause of action authorized.

Any person may bring suit against any governmental entity to enforce the provisions of AS

44.12.300

—

44.12.390

.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)

Sec. 44.12.390.
Severability.

The provisions of AS

44.12.300

—

44.12.390

are independent and severable, and if any provision of AS

44.12.300

—

44.12.390

, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of AS 44.12.300 — 44.12.390 shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent practicable.

History.

(§ 1 1998 Ballot Measure No. 6)